Illinois, session 104th, SB593.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Health 5Care Workforce Task Force Act. 6    Section 5. Policy and intent.7    (a) It is the policy of this State to advance and promote a 8robust and skilled health care workforce that will ensure 9access to high quality health care to all Illinoisans.10    (b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to coordinate 11the various agencies of the State and relevant stakeholders to 12garner a path toward meeting this policy objective. 13    Section 10. Findings. The General Assembly finds and 14declares:15        (1) The COVID-19 pandemic exacerbated an already 16    growing health care workforce shortage, creating 17    significant hiring challenges and reducing access to care.18        (2) Pandemic flexibility and reciprocity permitted an 19    additional 25,000 highly trained health care workers to 20    provide needed services to Illinoisans. The end of this 21    flexibility and reciprocity have resulted in a significant 22    loss to the State's health care workforce.  SB0593 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06862 BDA 16898 b1        (3) A February 2024 report created for the Commission 2    on Government Forecasting and Accountability shows that 3    health care is one of the stalwarts of the Illinois 4    economy and Illinois employers will add more health care 5    jobs at a stronger pace than other sectors, as a response 6    to a growing aging population. Illinois hospitals alone 7    are responsible for creating 445,000 jobs and infusing 8    $117,000,000,000 into the Illinois economy.9        (4) Studies from the Department of Financial and 10    Professional Regulation show that the majority of licensed 11    nurses are employed full-time while Illinois will still 12    face an estimated shortage of 15,000 registered nurses by 13    the end of 2025.14        (5) Continued advancements in health care and health 15    care delivery require constant review of resource 16    allocation to ensure the workforce is trained and prepared 17    for those changes.18        (6) The Illinois health care workforce is not 19    representative of the Illinois population due to barriers 20    for many underrepresented groups.21        (7) Average waiting times of 175 minutes in hospital 22    emergency departments have contributed to health care 23    workers facing unacceptably high levels of violence from 24    patients and visitors, further challenging the ability to 25    retain highly trained and qualified staff.26        (8) Public Act 103-0725 creates important   SB0593 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06862 BDA 16898 b1    opportunities for international medical graduate 2    physicians to play an important role in the growth of the 3    Illinois health care workforce.4        (9) The lack of an adequate health care workforce has, 5    in part, resulted in a continued shortage of critical 6    health care services and a reduction in access to care.7        (10) The launch and implementation of the 8    comprehensive regulatory environment by the Department of 9    Financial and Professional Regulation offers tangible 10    opportunities to use technology to enhance the licensure 11    experience for health care professionals as well as allow 12    data to drive decision-making in the workforce space. 13    Section 15. Health Care Workforce Task Force.14    (a) The Health Care Workforce Task Force is created within 15the Department of Public Health.16    (b) The Task Force shall consist of the following members17        (1) the Director of Public Health or the Director's 18    designee;19        (2) the Secretary of Financial and Professional 20    Regulation or the Secretary's designee;21        (3) the Director of Healthcare and Family Services or 22    the Director's designee;23        (4) the Attorney General or the Attorney General's 24    designee;25        (5) one member of the Senate, appointed by the   SB0593 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 06862 BDA 16898 b1    President of the Senate;2        (6) one member of the Senate, appointed by the 3    Minority Leader of the Senate;4        (7) one member of the House of Representatives, 5    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;6        (8) one member of the House of Representatives, 7    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 8    Representatives; and9        (9) the following members, appointed by the Governor:10            (A) one representative of a statewide organization 11        representing physicians;12            (B) one representative of a statewide organization 13        representing nurses;14            (C) one representative of a statewide organization 15        representing a majority of hospitals;16            (D) one representative of a statewide organization 17        representing organized labor;18            (E) one representative of a statewide organization 19        representing long-term care facilities;20            (F) one representative of an organization that 21        represents the interests of allied health 22        professionals;23            (G) one representative of an Illinois nursing 24        school;25            (H) one representative of a statewide organization 26        representing emergency physicians; and  SB0593 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 06862 BDA 16898 b1            (I) one representative of a statewide organization 2        representing federally qualified health centers.3    (c) All members of the Task Force shall serve without 4compensation. Members shall be appointed within 120 days after 5the effective date of this Act. At the initial meeting of the 6Task Force, the members of the Task Force shall elect 2 7co-chairs from the members appointed by the leadership of the 8General Assembly. 9    Section 20. Administrative support. The Department of 10Public Health shall provide staff and any necessary 11administrative and other support to the Task Force. The 12Department of Financial and Professional Regulation shall 13facilitate the prompt and timely collection and provision of 14data as requested by the Task Force. 15    Section 25. Meetings. The Task Force shall hold its 16initial meeting within 160 days after the effective date of 17this Act. The Task Force shall hold at least 4 meetings. 18    Section 30 Duties.19    (a) The Task Force shall have the following duties:20        (1) to review relevant statutes, rules, and 21    regulations that impact health care workers;22        (2) to review data on the various health care 23    professions to identify workforce shortages that may exist   SB0593 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 06862 BDA 16898 b1    and provide recommendations on addressing those shortages;2        (3) to provide recommendations on how to promote an 3    early interest in younger Illinoisans in joining the 4    health care workforce;5        (4) to provide recommendations on how to invest 6    resources to ensure health care workers are trained to 7    meet the demands of an ever-changing health care delivery 8    system;9        (5) to review and develop recommendations regarding 10    improving health care workforce recruitment and retention;11        (6) to review and develop recommendations to address 12    barriers for underrepresented groups in the health care 13    workforce;14        (7) review current capabilities of the comprehensive 15    regulatory environment and other similar state systems to 16    develop recommendations on how to use these tools to 17    further enhance the health care workforce;18        (8) to review and provide recommendations on the 19    opportunities to be more inclusive of foreign trained 20    physicians and other health care professionals in the 21    Illinois workforce;22        (9) to develop recommendations that will lead to all 23    Illinoisans having access to the appropriate level of care 24    at the right time; and25        (10) to develop recommendations that will reduce acts 26    of workplace violence being perpetrated against health   SB0593 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 06862 BDA 16898 b1    care workers.2    (b) The Task Force shall solicit feedback from 3stakeholders, advocates, and persons with lived experiences to 4inform the Task Force on the duties set forth in subsection (a) 5and any other considerations the Task Force deems necessary. 6    Section 35. Reporting. No later than one year after the 7first meeting of the Task Force, the Task Force shall submit to 8the General Assembly and the Governor a report including its 9recommendations. 10    Section 90. Dissolution; repeal. The Task Force is 11dissolved and this Act is repealed on December 31, 2027.